Maryland, session 2026, HB0923.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
1–201.
(a) For the purposes of subsection (b)(10) of this section, “child” means an
unmarried individual under the age of 21 years.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0923*

HOUSE BILL 923
(b) An equity court has jurisdiction over:
(1) adoption of a child, except for a child who is under the jurisdiction of
any juvenile court and who previously has been adjudicated to be a child in need of
assistance;
(2) alimony;
(3) annulment of a marriage;
(4) divorce;
(5) custody or guardianship of a child except for a child who is under the
jurisdiction of any juvenile court and who previously has been adjudicated to be a child in
need of assistance;
(6) visitation of a child;
(7) legitimation of a child;
(8) paternity;
(9) support of a child;
(10) custody or guardianship of an immigrant child pursuant to a motion for
Special Immigrant Juvenile factual findings requesting a determination that the child was
abused, neglected, or abandoned before the age of 18 years for purposes of § 101(a)(27)(J)
of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act; and
(11) a petition for authorization for a minor to marry.
(c) In exercising its jurisdiction over the custody, guardianship, visitation, or
support of a child, an equity court may:
(1) direct who shall have the custody or guardianship of a child, pendente
lite or permanently;
(2) determine who shall have visitation rights to a child;
(3) decide who shall be charged with the support of the child, pendente lite
or permanently;
(4) from time to time, set aside or modify its decree or order concerning the
child; or

HOUSE BILL 923 3
(5) issue an injunction to protect a party to the action from physical harm
or harassment.
(d) This section does not take away or impair the jurisdiction of a juvenile court
or a criminal court with respect to the custody, guardianship, visitation, and support of a
child.
1–201.1.
(A) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT IN ALL MATTERS
INVOLVING THE CARE AND CUSTODY OF CHILDREN, EQUITY COURTS SHALL
PROTECT AGAINST DISCRIMINATORY PRACTICES, IMPLICIT BIAS, AND PROCEDURAL
DISPARITIES THAT COULD HARM A CHILD’S STABILITY OR LONG–TERM WELFARE,
INCLUDING, FOR IMMIGRANT CHILDREN, THE ABILITY TO SEEK SPECIAL
IMMIGRANT JUVENILE STATUS, AS DESCRIBED IN § 1–201(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) AN EQUITY COURT SHALL APPLY THE SAME STANDARDS, INCLUDING
EVIDENTIARY STANDARDS, AND PROCEDURES, INCLUDING THE USE OF THE SAME
DOCUMENTS, IN A PROCEEDING FOR CUSTODY OR GUARDIANSHIP OF AN IMMIGRANT
CHILD THAT ARE APPLIED IN A PROCEEDING FOR CUSTODY OR GUARDIANSHIP OF A
CHILD WHO IS A UNITED STATES CITIZEN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.